Nebraska, session 109, LB896.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB896 LB896
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 33-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-110 County clerks shall receive no fee for the performance of the
following services: For issuing certificates of election; for performing
the duties of clerk of the county board; for taking acknowledgments of
claims against the county; for attesting or certifying any document
authorized by the county board or required by the departments of the
state; or for recording Army or Navy discharges or furnishing certified
copies thereof to be used in connection with any claim for compensation
or disability. A charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for any other
certificate and seal unless otherwise provided. The fees collected shall
be credited to the county general fund.
County clerks shall receive a fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for
the entire proceedings of issuing a marriage license, administering the
related oaths or affirmations, and recording a marriage certificate. An
additional fee of sixteen nine dollars shall be made for each certified
copy of a marriage record on file in the office of the county clerk. Both
such fees shall be deposited in the county general fund.
Sec. 2. Original section 33-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-